Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER 472]

VETERINARY TECHNOLOGY
PRACTICE

Section

472-1 Definitions

472-2 Practice of veterinary technology; qualifications;

registration required

472-3 Veterinary technician qualifications

Note

Chapter effective July 1, 2018.

Veterinary technician surcharge. L 2016, c 147, §3.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next